Florida, session 2026, SB7018.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 41 42 Section 1.âSubsection (91) of section 39.01, Florida 43 Statutes, is amended to read: 44 39.01âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, unless the 45 context otherwise requires: 46 (91)ââVisitorâ means a person who: 47 (a)âProvides care or supervision to a child in the home, 48 other than a contracted service provider screened pursuant to 49 chapter 435; or 50 (b)âIs 12 years of age or older, other than a child in 51 care, and who will be in the childâs home at least: 52 1.âTen Five consecutive days; or 53 2.âFourteen Seven days or more in 1 month. 54 Section 2.âSubsections (2) and (4), paragraphs (b) and (e) 55 of subsection (6), paragraph (b) of subsection (7), paragraph 56 (d) of subsection (10), and subsection (11) of section 409.1455, 57 Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph (i) is added to 58 subsection (6) of that section, to read: 59 409.1455âStep into Success Workforce Education and 60 Internship Pilot Program for foster youth and former foster 61 youth.â 62 (2)âCREATION.âThe department shall establish the 3-year 63 Step into Success Workforce Education and Internship Pilot 64 Program to give eligible foster youth and former foster youth an 65 opportunity to learn and develop essential workforce and 66 professional skills, to transition from the custody of the 67 department to independent living, and to become better prepared 68 for an independent and successful future. The pilot program must 69 consist of an independent living professionalism and workforce 70 education component and, for youth who complete that component, 71 an onsite workforce training internship component. In 72 consultation with subject-matter experts and the community-based 73 care lead agencies, the office shall develop and administer the 74 pilot program for interested foster youth and former foster 75 youth; however, the department may contract with entities that 76 have demonstrable subject-matter expertise in the transition to 77 adulthood for foster youth, workforce training and preparedness, 78 professional skills, and related subjects to collaborate with 79 the office in the development and administration of the pilot 80 program. The independent living professionalism and workforce 81 education component of the program must culminate in a 82 certificate that allows a former foster youth to participate in 83 the onsite workforce training internship. 84 (4)âREQUIREMENTS OF THE DEPARTMENT AND OFFICE.âThe 85 department shall establish and the office shall develop and 86 administer the pilot program for eligible foster youth and 87 former foster youth. The office shall do all of the following: 88 (a)âDevelop eligible foster youth and former foster youth 89 cohorts within the departmentâs regions. 90 (b)âCollaborate with local chambers of commerce and recruit 91 mentors and organizations within the departmentâs regions, 92 emphasizing recruitment of mentors and organizations in the 93 following counties: 94 1.âDuval. 95 2.âEscambia. 96 3.âHillsborough. 97 4.âPalm Beach. 98 5.âPolk. 99 (c)âProvide eligible former foster youth with a variety of 100 internship placement opportunities, including by connecting 101 existing third-party mentorship organizations that focus on 102 former foster youth with eligible former foster youth who have 103 an interest in such organizationsâ programs The pilot program 104 must be administered as part of an eligible foster youthâs 105 regular transition planning under s. 39.6035 or as a post 106 transition service for eligible former foster youth. The office 107 must begin the professionalism and workforce education component 108 of the program on or before January 1, 2024, and the onsite 109 workforce training internship component of the program on or 110 before July 1, 2024. 111 (6)âONSITE WORKFORCE TRAINING INTERNSHIP COMPONENT 112 REQUIREMENTS.âThe office shall do all of the following in 113 connection with the onsite workforce training internship program 114 for eligible former foster youth: 115 (b)âDevelop a minimum of 1 hour of required trauma-informed 116 training for mentors to satisfy the requirements provided in 117 sub-subparagraph (7)(b)1.e. Such training must include 118 interactive or experiential components, such as role-playing, 119 scenario discussion, or case studies. The office may provide at 120 least 4 additional 1-hour trainings on mentorship of special 121 populations as optional training opportunities, which must be 122 asynchronous and accessible to mentors online at their 123 convenience, and shall inform participating organizations of 124 these optional training opportunities teach the skills necessary 125 to engage with participating eligible former foster youth. 126 (e)âProvide a participating former foster youth with 127 financial assistance in the amount of $1,717 $1,517 monthly and 128 develop a process and schedule for the distribution of payments 129 to former foster youth participating in the component, subject 130 to the availability of funds. 131 (i)âAssign experienced staff to serve as program liaisons 132 who are available for mentors to contact whenever the mentors 133 need to debrief or have questions concerning a former foster 134 youth. 135 (7)âREQUIREMENTS FOR PARTICIPATING ORGANIZATIONS.âEach 136 organization participating in the onsite workforce training 137 internship component shall: 138 (b)âRecruit employees to serve as mentors for former foster 139 youth interning with such organizations. 140 1.âTo serve as a mentor, an employee must: 141 a.âHave worked in his or her career field or area for the 142 participating organization for at least 1 year; 143 b.âHave experience relevant to the job and task 144 responsibilities of the intern; 145 c.âSign a monthly hour statement for the intern; 146 d.âAllocate at least 1 hour per month to conduct mentor-led 147 performance reviews, to include a review of the internâs work 148 product, professionalism, time management, communication style, 149 and stress-management strategies; and 150 e.âComplete a minimum of 1 hour of trauma-informed training 151 to gain and maintain skills critical for successfully engaging 152 former foster youth. The employee must complete a 1-hour 153 training before being matched with a former foster youth which 154 covers core topics, including, but not limited to: 155 (I)âUnderstanding trauma and its impacts. 156 (II)âRecognizing and responding to trauma-related 157 behaviors. 158 (III)âDe-escalation strategies and crisis response. 159 (IV)âBoundaries and mentor self-care. 160 (V)âCommunication skills. 161 162 The department may offer a 1-hour training to review topics 163 covered by the training required under this sub-subparagraph 164 every subsequent year that the employee chooses to serve as a 165 mentor. 166 2.âSubject to available funding, an employee who serves as 167 a mentor and receives the required trauma-informed training is 168 eligible for a maximum payment of $1,200 per intern per fiscal 169 year, to be issued as a $100 monthly payment for every month of 170 service as a mentor. 171 3.âAn employee may serve as a mentor for a maximum of three 172 interns at one time and may not receive more than $3,600 in 173 compensation per fiscal year for serving as a mentor. Any time 174 spent serving as a mentor to an intern under this section counts 175 toward the minimum service required for eligibility for payments 176 pursuant to subparagraph 2. and this subparagraph. 177 4.âAn employee who serves as a mentor may participate in 178 additional trainings on the mentorship of special populations as 179 made available by the office. 180 (10)âCONDITIONS OF PARTICIPATION IN THE INTERNSHIP 181 COMPONENT.â 182 (d)âStipend money earned pursuant to the internship 183 component may not be considered earned income for purposes of 184 computing eligibility for federal or state benefits, including, 185 but not limited to, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 186 Program, a housing choice assistance voucher program, the 187 Temporary Cash Assistance Program, the Medicaid program, or the 188 school readiness program. Notwithstanding this paragraph, any 189 reduction in the amount of benefits or loss of benefits due to 190 receipt of the Step into Success stipend may be offset by an 191 additional stipend payment equal to the value of the maximum 192 benefit amount for a single person allowed under the 193 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program. 194 (11)âREPORT.âThe department shall include a section on the 195 Step into Success Workforce Education and Internship Pilot 196 Program in the independent living annual report prepared 197 pursuant to s. 409.1451(6) which includes, but is not limited 198 to, all of the following: 199 (a)âWhether the pilot program is in compliance with this 200 section, and if not, barriers to compliance. 201 (b)âA list of participating organizations and the number of 202 interns. 203 (c)âA summary of recruitment efforts to increase the number 204 of participating organizations. 205 (d)âA summary of the feedback and surveys received pursuant 206 to paragraph (6)(h) from participating former foster youth, 207 mentors, and others who have participated in the pilot program. 208 (e)âRecommendations, if any, for actions necessary to 209 improve the quality, effectiveness, and outcomes of the pilot 210 program. 211 (f)âEmployment outcomes of former foster youth who 212 participated in the pilot program, including employment status 213 after completion of the program, whether he or she is employed 214 by the participating organization in which he or she interned or 215 by another entity, and job description and salary information, 216 if available. 217 Section 3.âPresent subsections (9), (10), and (11) of 218 section 1004.615, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 219 subsections (10), (11), and (12), respectively, and a new 220 subsection (9) is added to that section, to read: 221 1004.615âFlorida Institute for Child Welfare.â 222 (9)âThe institute, in collaboration with the Department of 223 Children and Familiesâ Office of Quality and Office of Child and 224 Family Well-being, shall establish a program to identify, 225 describe, and catalogue best practices within the community 226 based care model. Such best practices may include, but need not 227 be limited to, management practices, administrative structure, 228 internal and external communication, quality assurance, contract 229 management, program development and creation, and child and 230 family outcome monitoring. 231 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.